Maryland, session 2026, HB1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
1–402.
Property owners in this State have the following rights:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1518*

HOUSE BILL 1518
(9) after an appeal hearing, the right to:
(i) not have an assessment increased during the current [3–year]
5–YEAR cycle because of information ascertained at an appeal hearing on residential
property; and
(ii) a reinspection of a property, upon request, to review updated
information revealed during an appeal hearing that could result in a decreased assessment;
(11) the right to file a petition for review within any year of the [3–year]
5–YEAR assessment cycle, as provided in § 8–415 of this article;
2–203.
(a) (1) The Department shall continually review all real property assessments
to provide a review of each assessment at least once in each [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle.
(2) If any assessment has not been reviewed during a [3–year] 5–YEAR
cycle, the Department may order a review of the assessment at any time.
2–218.2.
The Department shall publish on the Department’s website a plain language
description of the following:
(4) the circumstances under which the Department is required to revalue
real property in any year of a [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle; and
7–204.1.
(a) An organization that owns property in Baltimore City that is not subject to
property tax as of June 1, 2014, under § 7–202 or § 7–204 of this subtitle shall submit an
application to the Department in accordance with this section:
(1) beginning with April 1, 2016, on or before the earlier of April 1 of the
year in which the property is assessed in accordance with the Department’s [3–year]
5–YEAR cycle or April 1, 2017; and
(2) on or before April 1 of each subsequent year in which the property is
assessed in accordance with the Department’s [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle.
8–103.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1518 3
(2) “5–YEAR CYCLE” MEANS A CONTINUOUS SERIES OF 5 CALENDAR
YEAR PERIODS BEGINNING FOR EACH PERIOD WITH THE 1ST CALENDAR YEAR
AFTER THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH A REVIEW OF REAL PROPERTY IS CONDUCTED
UNDER § 8–104(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(2)] (3) “New statewide value” means the phased in value of all real
property subject to property tax on January 1 preceding any taxable year, excluding the
phased in value of real property assessed for the 1st time during the calendar year
beginning on that January 1.
[(3)] (4) “Phased in value” means for the 1st, 2nd, [or] 3rd, 4TH, OR 5TH
year of a [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle:
(i) the prior value of real property increased by [one–third,
two–thirds,] ONE–FIFTH, TWO–FIFTHS, THREE–FIFTHS, FOUR–FIFTHS, or the full
amount by which the value increased over the prior value based on a physical inspection of
the real property; or
(ii) if the value of real property has not increased, the value
determined in the most recent valuation.
[(4) “3–year cycle” means a continuous series of 3 calendar year periods
beginning for each period with the 1st calendar year after the calendar year in which a
physical inspection of real property is made under § 8–104(b) of this subtitle.]
8–104.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding a revaluation under subsection (c) of this section, the
Department or supervisor shall value all real property once in every [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle
based on a review of the real property under § 2–203 of this article.
(2) The date of finality for real property that is valued under this
subsection is the January 1 immediately before the 1st taxable year to which the
assessment based on the new value is applicable.
(c) (1) In any year of a [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle, real property shall be revalued
if any of the factors listed below causes a change in the value of the real property:
(i) the zoning classification is changed at the initiative of the owner
or anyone having an interest in the property;
(ii) a change in use or character occurs;
(iii) substantially completed improvements are made which add at
least $100,000 in value to the property;

HOUSE BILL 1518
(iv) an error in calculation or measurement of the real property
caused the value to be erroneous;
(v) a residential use assessment is terminated pursuant to § 8–226
of this title; or
(vi) a subdivision occurs. For purposes of this subsection,
“subdivision” means the division of real property into 2 or more parcels by subdivision plat,
condominium plat, time–share, metes and bounds, or other means.
(2) When real property is revalued under this subsection, the Department
or supervisor shall:
(i) determine the value that would have resulted if the revaluation
had occurred for the 1st year of the [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle;
(ii) determine the value that would have resulted if the revaluation
had occurred for the 1st year of the preceding [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle; and
(iii) adjust the phased–in value for each of the years remaining in the
[3–year] 5–YEAR cycle to reflect the change that results from the revaluation.
8–209.
(g) (1) In this subsection the following words have the meanings indicated:
(iii) “average gross income” means the average of the [2] 4 highest
years of gross income during a [3–year] 5–YEAR period;
(5) If land that appears to be actively used does not yield an average gross
income of $2,500, the Director shall waive the gross income requirement on finding that:
(i) the land is leased and the nature of the farm or agricultural use
of the land when related to the amount of the land in farm or agricultural use reasonably
would be expected to yield an average gross income of at least $2,500;
(ii) the nature of the farm or agricultural use of the land and the
amount of the land in farm or agricultural use reasonably would be expected to yield an
average gross income of at least $2,500 from the agricultural products, if sold, that are
derived from the use of the land;
(iii) a drought or other natural cause has adversely affected the
income–producing capability of the land during a [3–year] 5–YEAR period; or
(iv) for a newly established farm or agricultural use, the nature of
the use and the amount of the land in farm or agricultural use reasonably would be expected

HOUSE BILL 1518 5
to yield an average gross income of at least $2,500 if the use had existed for a [3–year]
5–YEAR period.
(i) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(iii) [“3–year] “5–YEAR cycle” has the meaning stated in § 8–103 of
this title.
(2) The Director may grant a waiver from the requirements of subsection
(e) or (g) of this section if:
(i) the property owner is at least 70 years of age;
(ii) the property owner applies to the Department for a waiver of the
requirements of either subsection (e) or (g) of this section;
(iii) the land has not changed ownership during the two previous
[3–year] 5–YEAR cycles; and
(iv) the land has been assessed for at least the two previous [3–year]
5–YEAR cycles on the basis of farm or agricultural use under the law or regulations of the
Department that were in effect as of the date of the application.
(3) The Director may grant a waiver from the requirements of subsection
(e) or (g) of this section if:
(iv) the land has been assessed for at least the two previous [3–year]
5–YEAR cycles on the basis of farm or agricultural use under the law or regulations of the
Department that were in effect as of the date of the application.
8–401.
(c) The notice for subsection (b)(1) of this section shall include:
(1) the amount of the current value;
(2) the amount of the proposed value including a statement that the total
amount of the proposed value is the value for purposes of appeal;
(3) the amount of the proposed value that will be the basis for the
assessment in each year of the [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle;
(4) a statement:
(i) indicating the right to appeal; and

HOUSE BILL 1518
(ii) briefly describing the appeal process and the property owner’s
bill of rights; and
(5) a statement that valuation records are available as provided by §
14–201 of this article.
(d) In the instance of notices required in subsection (b)(2), (3), (4), and (5) of this
section, the notice shall include:
(1) the amount of the current value;
(2) the amount of the proposed or final value;
(3) the amount of the proposed value that is the basis for the assessment
in the applicable years of the [3–year] 5–YEAR cycle;
(4) a statement:
(i) indicating the right of appeal; and
(ii) briefly describing the appeal process and the property owner’s
bill of rights; and
(5) a statement that valuation records are available as provided by §
14–201 of this article.
(f) A failure to send a notice of any change in value or classification within 30
days after the date provided in subsection (e) of this section creates an irrebuttable
presumption that in the instances specified in subsection (b)(1) through (4) of this section
the prior value has not changed unless:
(1) the property has been transferred for consideration to new ownership
during the previous calendar year;
(2) the zoning classification of the property changed during the current
[triennial] QUINQUENNIAL cycle or the previous calendar year, whichever is earlier,
resulting in an increased value of the property;
(3) a substantial change occurred in the use or character of the property
during the current [triennial] QUINQUENNIAL cycle or the previous calendar year,
whichever is earlier;
(4) extensive improvements have been made on the property during the
current [triennial] QUINQUENNIAL cycle or the previous calendar year, whichever is
earlier, as provided in § 8–104(c)(1)(iii) of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1518 7
(5) due to an error in calculating or measuring improvements on the
property the assessment for the previous taxable year was clearly erroneous; or
(6) the assessment has been decreased.
8–417.
(c) (1) When escaped property is assessed it is placed on the assessment roll
and tax roll and is subject to property tax for:
(i) the current taxable year; and
(ii) not more than [3] 5 previous taxable years.
(2) The county tax imposition for each county or municipal corporation tax
imposition for each municipal corporation shall be deemed to have covered all property that
was not assessed but which should have been assessed for the year that any county or
municipal corporation tax was imposed.
9–105.1.
(b) On or before January 1 each year, Baltimore City shall mail a notice of the tax
credit under § 9–105 of this subtitle to each homeowner in Baltimore City:
(1) who has not applied for the tax credit under § 9–105 of this subtitle;
and
(2) whose dwelling has an assessed value, when fully phased in, in the
current [3–year] 5–YEAR assessment cycle that is more than 10% greater than the
dwelling’s assessed value, when fully phased in, in the immediately preceding [3–year]
5–YEAR assessment cycle.
14–1103.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, property
tax shall be assessed for the taxable period specified in Title 8 of this article.
(b) Escaped property shall be assessed under § 8–417 of this article at the time
the property is located and for not more than the [3] 5 preceding taxable years.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.